Maryland, session 2026, HB0146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
9–11A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) (1) “On–site wastewater system” means:
(i) A wastewater system designed to treat and dispose of effluent on:
1. The same property that produces the wastewater; or
2. An easement; or
(ii) A holding tank.
(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, “on–site
wastewater system” includes a septic or any other on–site sewage disposal system.
(3) “On–site wastewater system” does not include a wastewater treatment
system that:
(i) Requires a discharge permit from the Department; or
(ii) Treats 5,000 or more gallons per day.
Article – Real Property
8–122.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.

HOUSE BILL 146 3
(2) “DELEGATED APPROVAL AUTHORITY” MEANS THE LOCAL
HEALTH DEPARTMENT OR COUNTY AGENCY THAT HAS RECEIVED AN ON–SITE
SEWAGE DISPOSAL SYSTEM DELEGATION OF AUTHORITY BY THE DEPARTMENT OF
THE ENVIRONMENT.
(3) “ON–SITE WASTEWATER SYSTEM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
9–11A–01 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(B) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2028, AND BEFORE EACH NEW TENANT
OCCUPIES THE PROPERTY THEREAFTER, A LANDLORD OF PROPERTY THAT IS
SERVED BY AN ON–SITE WASTEWATER SYSTEM SHALL ENSURE THAT THE SYSTEM
HAS BEEN:
(1) INSPECTED BY AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS LICENSED UNDER TITLE 9,
SUBTITLE 11A OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE TO PERFORM PROPERTY TRANSFER
INSPECTIONS FOR ON–SITE WASTEWATER SYSTEMS; AND
(2) PUMPED OUT BY AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS LICENSED UNDER TITLE
9, SUBTITLE 11A OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE TO PERFORM PUMPING SERVICES
FOR ON–SITE WASTEWATER SYSTEMS.
(C) FOR PURPOSES OF MEETING THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTION
(B) OF THIS SECTION, A PROPERTY TRANSFER INSPECTION OR PUMPING SERVICE
PERFORMED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION IS VALID FOR
3 YEARS.
(D) (1) IF AN INSPECTION UNDER THIS SECTION IDENTIFIES A FAILING
ON–SITE WASTEWATER SYSTEM, THE LANDLORD OF THE PROPERTY SHALL NOTIFY
THE DELEGATED APPROVAL AUTHORITY:
(1) (I) ABOUT THE FAILURE; AND
(2) (II) WHEN THE SYSTEM IS FIXED.
(2) A DELEGATED APPROVAL AUTHORITY SHALL APPROVE, TO THE
EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE REPAIR OR REPLACEMENT OF ANY FAILED
COMPONENTS OF A DRAIN FIELD OF A FAILING ON–SITE WASTEWATER SYSTEM
NECESSARY TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
10–716.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.

HOUSE BILL 146
(2) “DELEGATED APPROVAL AUTHORITY” MEANS THE LOCAL
HEALTH DEPARTMENT OR COUNTY AGENCY THAT HAS RECEIVED AN ON–SITE
SEWAGE DISPOSAL SYSTEM DELEGATION OF AUTHORITY BY THE DEPARTMENT OF
THE ENVIRONMENT.
(3) “ON–SITE WASTEWATER SYSTEM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
9–11A–01 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(B) THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION DO NOT APPLY IF:
(1) (I) 1. THE PROPERTY TRANSFER INVOLVES THE TRANSFER
OF RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY THAT IS BETWEEN:
A. CURRENT SPOUSES;
B. A PARENT AND A CHILD; OR
C. SIBLINGS, BY WHOLE BLOOD, IF THE PROPERTY IS
HELD IN TRUST;
2. THE PROPERTY’S MORTGAGE IS BEING REFINANCED;
OR
3. THE CHANGE IN OWNERSHIP OR FORM OF
OWNERSHIP DOES NOT INVOLVE THE INTRODUCTION OF NEW PARTIES; AND
(II) THE ON–SITE WASTEWATER SYSTEM HAS BEEN INSPECTED
WITHIN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 5–YEAR PERIOD; OR
(2) THE PROPERTY TRANSFER IS THE INITIAL TRANSFER AFTER
CONSTRUCTION OF THE PROPERTY.
(C) (1) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2028, A CONTRACT FOR THE SALE OF REAL
PROPERTY THAT IS SERVED BY AN ON–SITE WASTEWATER SYSTEM SHALL INCLUDE
A PROVISION REQUIRING, AS A CONDITION OF THE SALE, THAT THE PURCHASER
ENSURE THAT THE SYSTEM HAS BEEN:
(I) INSPECTED BY AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS LICENSED UNDER
TITLE 9, SUBTITLE 11A OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE TO PERFORM PROPERTY
TRANSFER INSPECTIONS FOR ON–SITE WASTEWATER SYSTEMS; AND

HOUSE BILL 146 5
(II) PUMPED OUT BY AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS LICENSED UNDER
TITLE 9, SUBTITLE 11A OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE TO PERFORM PUMPING
SERVICES FOR ON–SITE WASTEWATER SYSTEMS.
(2) (I) SETTLEMENT ON THE CONTRACT FOR THE SALE OF THE
REAL PROPERTY MAY NOT OCCUR UNTIL THE VENDOR AND THE PURCHASER
RECEIVE A REPORT ON THE PROPERTY TRANSFER INSPECTION PERFORMED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND CONFIRMATION OF THE PUMPING
SERVICE PERFORMED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) AT SETTLEMENT ON THE CONTRACT FOR THE SALE OF THE
REAL PROPERTY, THE VENDOR AND THE PURCHASER SHALL EACH CERTIFY IN
WRITING THAT THEY HAVE RECEIVED AND REVIEWED THE REPORT AND
CONFIRMATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(D) UNLESS OTHERWISE REQUIRED AS PART OF A REAL ESTATE CONTRACT
OR MORTGAGE REQUIREMENT, FOR PURPOSES OF MEETING THE REQUIREMENTS
UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(1) OF THIS SECTION, A PROPERTY TRANSFER INSPECTION
OR PUMPING SERVICE PERFORMED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (C)(1) OF
THIS SECTION IS VALID FOR 3 YEARS.
(E) (1) IF AN INSPECTION UNDER THIS SECTION IDENTIFIES A FAILING
ON–SITE WASTEWATER SYSTEM, THE OWNER OF THE PROPERTY SHALL NOTIFY THE
DELEGATED APPROVAL AUTHORITY:
(1) (I) ABOUT THE FAILURE; AND
(2) (II) WHEN THE SYSTEM IS FIXED.
(2) A DELEGATED APPROVAL AUTHORITY SHALL APPROVE, TO THE
EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE REPAIR OR REPLACEMENT OF ANY FAILED
COMPONENTS OF A DRAIN FIELD OF A FAILING ON–SITE WASTEWATER SYSTEM
NECESSARY TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
Chapter 419 of the Acts of 2022
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before July 1, [2025]
2027, the Department of the Environment, in consultation with the State Board of
On–Site Wastewater Professionals, shall adopt regulations to implement Section 2 of this
Act.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before July 1, [2026]
2028, all individuals who provide on–site wastewater services in the State shall be licensed
by the State Board of On–Site Wastewater Professionals.

HOUSE BILL 146
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act may not be
interpreted to limit a mortgage company or financial institution from requiring an
inspection of an on–site wastewater system as part of contract terms for the sale or transfer
of real property.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.